Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 3. State Board of Education
§ 21-2-305.
Reports and assistance from local boards and officials.

In addition to any other powers assigned to it by law, the state board may:

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 217, § 3.

Require such reports and other assistance from school boards and officials as it may from time to time deem necessary and advisable.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 127, §§ 24, 34; C.S. 1920, §§ 2351, 2361; R.S. 1931, §§ 99-122, 99-133; C.S. 1945, §§ 67-123, 67-133; W.S. 1957, §§ 21-22, 21-32; Laws 1959, ch. 109, §§ 3, 8; 1967, ch. 43, § 1; 1969, ch. 111, § 15; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-15; 1993, ch. 217, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to suspension or dismissal of teachers by board of trustees of district, see §

21-7-110

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Burden of proof in attack on certificate. —

A person attacking the validity of a teacher's certificate for alleged failure to comply with rules has the burden of showing that professional reading directed to be done by the state board of education was not done by the defendant. State ex rel. Pape v. Hockett, 61 Wyo. 145, 156 P.2d 299,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1945).

Quoted

in

Wyoming State Dep't of Educ. v. Barber, 649 P.2d 681,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 374

(Wyo. 1982).

Cited

in

Johnston v. Board of Trustees, 661 P.2d 1045,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1983).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Revocation of teacher's certificate for moral unfitness, 97 ALR2d 827.

Bias of members of license revocation board, 97 ALR2d 1210.

Use of illegal drugs as ground for dismissal of teacher or denial or cancelation of teacher's certificate, 47 ALR3d 754.

Validity of state or local government regulation requiring private school to report attendance and similar information to government — post-Yoder cases, 8 ALR5th 875.

§ 21-2-306.
Reports of state superintendent and state board.

The state superintendent and the state board shall, in accordance with W.S.

9-2-1014

, report to the governor and recommend such legislation concerning education and appropriations for educational activities as they may deem appropriate.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 127, § 9; C.S. 1920, § 2336; R.S. 1931, § 99-108; C.S. 1945, § 67-108; W.S. 1957, § 21-8; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 16; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-16; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

The 2013 amendment,

added “, the director” near the beginning of the section.

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

deleted “the director” following “The state superintendent” and made a related change.

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

Cited

in

Johnston v. Board of Trustees, 661 P.2d 1045,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1983).

§ 21-2-307.
State board of career and technical education; duties.

The state board of education acts as the state board of career and technical education and may promulgate rules necessary to implement this section. The executive director of the community college commission is designated an ex officio member of the state board of career and technical education.

In addition to other duties assigned under W.S.

21-2-304

, the state board shall review career and technical education programs offered by school districts to ensure the programs satisfactorily serve the needs of students within the state and are aligned with state content and performance standards prescribed in accordance with W.S.

21-2-304

(a)(iii).

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 190, § 1; 2003, ch. 164, § 2; 2021 ch. 66, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to appointment of director of community college commission, see § 21-18-202(a)(i).

As to career-vocational education program grants, see §

21-12-105

.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "career and technical" for "career-vocational" throughout the section.